Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.190

Remedies and penalties in chapter nonexclusive and cumulative.

The remedies and penalties provided for in this chapter are nonexclusive and cumulative and do not affect any other actions or proceedings.

[ 1986 c 136 s 19.]